Arkansas, session 2025, HB1900.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 15-72-305(a)(5)(A)(vii), concerning
information regarding information on deductions that the operator is required
to provide to a royalty owner, is amended to read as follows:
(vii) Any and all deductions Each deduction and
associated amount deducted from the payment, which shall be itemized as to
the nature, purpose, and amount of the each deduction from the payment to the
royalty owner; and

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 15-72-305(a)(5)(D)(iv), concerning a civil
penalty authorized as a sanction by the Oil and Gas Commission on a
*CRH313*
03/31/2025 7:32:21 AM CRH313

HB1900
noncompliant party related to a royalty owner's request for information or
answers, is amended to read as follows:
(iv) These sanctions shall include, but not be
limited to, a civil penalty of up to, but not more than, five hundred dollars
($500)the maximum penalty amount allowed for a delinquency as described in §
15-74-709(a)(2). The commission shall have the authority to suspend the
imposition of any sanction for a maximum period of sixty (60) days in order
to allow the noncompliant party the opportunity to furnish proof to the
commission of his or her compliance with any commission order.



























03/31/2025 7:32:21 AM CRH313